zh-CN: 户外散步活动: 徒步; 北欧式健走; 越野跑; 徒步; 其他
pl: Spacery na świeżym powietrzu: Wędrówki górskie; Nordic walking; Biegi przełajowe; Trekking; Inne
de: Wanderaktivität im Freien: Wandern; Nordic Walking; Traillauf; Trekking; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Atividade de caminhada ao ar livre: Caminhada; Nordic walking; Corrida em trilha; Trekking; Outro
zh-TW: 戶外步行動: 健行; 北歐式健走; 越野跑; 長距離步行; 其他
sk-SK: Pohyb v prírode: Pešia turistika; Nordic walking; Trailový beh; Treking; Iné
sv: Utomhuspromenad: Vandring; Stavgång; Terränglöpning; Vandring; Övrigt
tr: Açık havada yürüyüş aktivitesi: Doğa yürüyüşü; Kuzey disiplinli yürüyüş; Patika koşusu; Doğa yürüyüşü; Diğer
hr-HR: Hodanje na otvorenom: Planinarenje; Nordijsko hodanje; Trčanje po stazi; Treking; Ostalo
ja: 屋外ウォーキングアクティビティ: ハイキング; ノルディックウォーキング; トレイルランニング; トレッキング; その他
pt-PT: Atividade de caminhada ao ar livre: Caminhada; Caminhada nórdica; Corrida de trail; Pedestrianismo; Outro
nl: Wandelactiviteit buiten: Hiking; Nordic walking; Trailrunning; Trekking; Andere
bg-BG: Разходка на открито: Туризъм; Скандинавско ходене; Бягане по пътека; Трекинг; Други
fr: Activité de marche en plein air: Randonnée; marche nordique; Course en sentier; Trekking; Autre
th: กิจกรรมการเดินกลางแจ้ง: การเดินป่า; เดินแบบนอร์ดิก; วิ่งเทรล; เดินป่าทางไกล; อื่นๆ
ko: 야외 걷기 활동: 하이킹; 노르딕 워킹; 트레일 러닝; 트레킹; 기타
hu: Szabadtéri sporttevékenység típusa: Túra; Nordic walking; Terepfutás; Trekking; Egyéb
cs: Druh chůze: Turistika; Nordic walking; Trailový běh; Trekking; Jiné
sl-SI: Dejavnost hoje na prostem: Pohodništvo; Nordijska hoja; Tek po stezi; Treking; Drugo
es: Actividad de caminar al aire libre: Senderismo; Marcha nórdica; Correr por senderos; Senderismo; Otros
lt-LT: Pasivaikščiojimų lauke pobūdis: Žygiai kalnuose; Šiaurietiškas ėjimas; Bėgimas bekele; Žygiai pėsčiomis; Kita
it: Camminata all’aperto: Escursionismo; Camminata nordica; Corsa su pista; Trekking; Altro
nb: Utendørs turaktivitet: Fjelltur; Stavgang; Terrengløp; Fottur; Annet
ro-RO: Activitate de plimbare în aer liber: Drumeții; Mers nordic; Pe potecă; Trekking; Altele
fi: Ulkona kävelyn toiminta: Patikointi; Sauvakävely; Polkujuoksu; Vaellus; Muu
en: Outdoor walking activity: Hiking; Nordic walking; Trail running; Trekking; Other
el: Υπαίθρια δραστηριότητα πεζοπορίας: Πεζοπορία; Χιονοδρομία μεγάλων αποστάσεων; Ορεινό τρέξιμο; Πεζοπορία; Άλλο
vi: Hoạt động đi bộ ngoài trời: Đi bộ đường dài; Đi bộ Bắc Âu; Chạy địa hình; Đi bộ đường rừng; Khác
da: Udendørs gå-aktivitet: Vandring; Stavgang; Trailløb; Trekking; Andet
ru: Ходьба на свежем воздухе: Пеший туризм; Скандинавская ходьба; Бег по пересеченной местности; Треккинг; Другое